Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-3203
Scope; choice of law; forum.

(a) The Uniform Special Deposits Act applies to a special deposit under an account agreement that states the intention of the parties to establish a special deposit governed by the act, regardless of whether a party to the account agreement or a transaction related to the special deposit, or the special deposit itself, has a reasonable relation to this state.

(b) The parties to an account agreement may choose a forum in this state for settling a dispute arising out of the special deposit, regardless of whether a party to the account agreement or a transaction related to the special deposit, or the special deposit itself, has a reasonable relation to this state.

(c) The act does not affect:

(1) a right or obligation relating to a deposit other than a special deposit under the act; or

(2) the voidability of a deposit or transfer that is fraudulent or voidable under other law.

Laws 2025, LB231, § 3.